Tennessee, session 114, SB1054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-207(g), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(g)
(1) The board shall issue a foreign training license of limited duration to
an internationally licensed physician who has successfully completed the
examination as described in subsection (b) upon finding sufficient evidence that
the internationally licensed physician:
(A) Possesses a:
(i) Certificate from a medical school whose curriculum is:
(a) Approved by the American Medical Association
or its extant accreditation program for medical education,
or its successor; or
(b) Judged to be acceptable by the board; and
(ii) Copy of a permanent ECFMG certificate;
(B) Completed a postgraduate training program of a minimum of
three (3) years in a country approved by the internationally licensed
physician's licensing country or has practiced as a medical professional
performing the duties of a physician for seven (7) years;
SB1054
001621
- 1 -

(C) Has practiced as a medical professional performing the duties
of a physician for at least three (3) years in the licensing country after the
postgraduate training or equivalent as described in subdivision (g)(1)(B);
(D) Has been in good standing with the medical licensing or
regulatory institution of the internationally licensed physician licensing
country within the last five (5) years and does not have any pending
discipline before the licensing body;
(E) Is legally entitled to live or work in the United States if the
person is not a citizen of the United States;
(F) Has sufficient evidence of good moral character; and
(G) Has paid:
(i) A nonrefundable application fee as set by the board;
and
(ii) An examination fee as described in this section.
(2) An applicant under subdivision (g)(1) shall submit sufficient evidence
that the applicant is an internationally licensed physician and has an offer for
employment as a physician at a healthcare provider that operates in this state.
(3) An internationally licensed physician who is granted a foreign training
license under subdivision (g)(1) shall only provide medical services at the
healthcare provider identified in subdivision (g)(2) during the period of the foreign
training license unless the licensee notifies the board of a change of eligible
healthcare provider employer.
(4) The board may grant a full and unrestricted license to practice
medicine to a foreign training licensee under subdivision (g)(1) who is in good
- 2 - 001621

standing and has actively practiced medicine in this state for two (2) years after
the date of foreign training licensure.
(5) As used in this subsection (g), "healthcare provider" means an
individual, entity, corporation, person, or organization, whether for profit or
nonprofit, that furnishes, bills, or is paid for a healthcare procedure or service
delivery in the normal course of business, and includes a healthcare
professional, healthcare facility, a health system, hospital, hospital-based facility,
freestanding emergency facility, urgent care clinic, or entity licensed or certified
to provide health services in this state as recognized by the board.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001621